Washington statutes.
RCW 41.16.060

Tax levy for fund.

(1) It is the duty of the legislative authority of each municipality, each year as a part of its annual tax levy, to levy and place in the fund a tax of twenty-two and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value against all the taxable property of such municipality: PROVIDED, That if a report by a qualified actuary on the condition of the fund establishes that the whole or any part of said dollar rate is not necessary to maintain the actuarial soundness of the fund, the levy of said twenty-two and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value may be omitted, or the whole or any part of such dollar rate may be levied and used for any other municipal purpose.

(2) It is the duty of the legislative authority of each municipality, each year as a part of its annual tax levy and in addition to the city levy limit set forth in RCW 84.52.043, to levy and place in the fund an additional tax of twenty-two and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value against all taxable property of such municipality: PROVIDED, That if a report by a qualified actuary establishes that all or any part of the additional twenty-two and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value levy is unnecessary to meet the estimated demands on the fund under this chapter for the ensuing budget year, the levy of said additional twenty-two and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value may be omitted, or the whole or any part of such dollar rate may be levied and used for any other municipal purpose, subject to subsection (4) of this section: PROVIDED FURTHER, That cities that have annexed to library districts according to RCW 27.12.360 through 27.12.395 and/or fire protection districts according to RCW 52.04.061 through 52.04.081 may not levy this additional tax to the extent that it causes the combined levies to exceed the statutory or constitutional limits.

(3) The amount of a levy under this section allocated to the pension fund may be reduced in the same proportion as the regular property tax levy of the municipality is reduced by chapter 84.55 RCW.

(4) If a municipality no longer has any beneficiaries receiving benefits under this chapter, the whole or any part of such additional levy under subsection (2) of this section may continue to be levied for the payment of benefits provided under RCW 41.26.150(1) or other municipal purpose until such time that the municipality no longer has any beneficiaries receiving benefits under RCW 41.26.150(1), however the proceeds of the additional levy must be annually expended for payment of benefits provided under RCW 41.26.150(1) prior to being spent for any other purpose.

[ 2019 c 320 s 1; 1987 c 319 s 2; 1980 c 155 s 4; 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 43; 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 144; 1970 ex.s. c 92 s 2; 1965 ex.s. c 45 s 1; 1961 c 255 s 9; 1951 c 72 s 1; 1947 c 91 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9578-45. Prior: 1929 c 86 s 12; 1919 c 196 s 15; 1909 c 50 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Applicability—1980 c 155: See note following RCW 84.40.030.

Severability—Effective dates and termination dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.

Effective date—Application—1970 ex.s. c 92: See note following RCW 84.52.010.